Indiana, session 2026, SB251.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 7.1-1-3-13.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2020,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.5. "Conviction for operating while intoxicated"
means a conviction (as defined in IC 9-13-2-38) for a crime under
IC 9-30-5-1 through IC 9-30-5-9, IC 35-46-9-6 (before its repeal), or
IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal).
SECTION 2. IC 9-13-2-130, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2020,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 130. "Previous conviction of operating while
intoxicated" means a previous conviction for:
(1) an alcohol related or drug related crime under Acts 1939, c.48,
s.52, as amended, IC 9-4-1-54 (repealed September 1, 1983), or
IC 9-11-2 (repealed July 1, 1991); or
(2) a crime under IC 9-30-5-1 through IC 9-30-5-9; or
(3) a crime under IC 35-46-9 (before its repeal), IC 14-1-5
(before its repeal), or IC 14-15-8-8 (before its repeal).
SECTION 3. IC 9-13-2-196, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2020,
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 196. (a) "Vehicle" means, except as otherwise
provided in this section, a device in, upon, or by which a person or
property is, or may be, transported or drawn upon a highway. The term
does not include the following:
(1) A device moved by human power.
(2) A device that runs only on rails or tracks.
(3) A wheelchair.
(4) An electric foot scooter.
(b) For purposes of IC 9-17, the term includes the following:
(1) Off-road vehicles.
(2) Manufactured homes or mobile homes that are:
(A) personal property not held for resale; and
(B) not attached to real estate by a permanent foundation.
(3) Watercraft.
(c) For purposes of IC 9-22 (except IC 9-22-6) and IC 9-32, the term
refers to a vehicle or watercraft of a type that must be registered under
IC 9-18-2 (before its expiration) or IC 9-18.1, other than an off-road
vehicle or a snowmobile under IC 9-18-2.5 (before its expiration) or
IC 9-18.1-14.
(d) For purposes of IC 9-30-5, IC 9-30-6, IC 9-30-8, and IC 9-30-9,
the term means a device for transportation by land, or air, or water.
The term does not include an electric personal assistive mobility
device.
SECTION 4. IC 9-30-5-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.217-2017,
SECTION 74, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) In addition to any criminal penalty
imposed for an offense under this chapter, the court shall: If a person
has one (1) previous conviction of operating while intoxicated, the
court shall:
(1) order:
(A) that the person be imprisoned for at least five (5) ten (10)
days; or
(B) the person to perform at least two hundred forty (240)
hours of community restitution or service; and
(2) order the person to receive an assessment of the person's
degree of alcohol and drug abuse and, if appropriate, to
successfully complete an alcohol or drug abuse treatment
program, including an alcohol deterrent program if the person
suffers from alcohol abuse.
if the person has one (1) previous conviction of operating while
intoxicated.
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(b) In addition to any criminal penalty imposed for an offense under
this chapter, the court shall: If a person has at least two (2) previous
convictions of operating while intoxicated, the court shall:
(1) order:
(A) that the person be imprisoned for at least ten (10) twenty
(20) days; or
(B) the person to perform at least four hundred eighty (480)
hours of community restitution or service; and
(2) order the person to receive an assessment of the person's
degree of alcohol and drug abuse and, if appropriate, to
successfully complete an alcohol or drug abuse treatment
program, including an alcohol deterrent program if the person
suffers from alcohol abuse.
if the person has at least two (2) previous convictions of operating
while intoxicated.
(c) Notwithstanding IC 35-50-2-2.2 and IC 35-50-3-1, a sentence
imposed under this section may not be suspended. The court may
require that the person serve the term of imprisonment in an
appropriate facility at whatever time or intervals (consecutive or
intermittent) determined appropriate by the court. However:
(1) at least forty-eight (48) hours of the sentence must be served
consecutively; and
(2) the entire sentence must be served within six (6) months after
the date of sentencing.
(d) Notwithstanding IC 35-50-6, A person does not earn good time
credit (as defined in IC 35-50-6-0.5) while serving a sentence imposed
under this section.
(e) This section does not increase the maximum sentence for the
offense as provided by either IC 35-50-2 or IC 35-50-3.
SECTION 5. IC 9-30-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2021,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A physician, a person trained in retrieving
contraband or obtaining bodily substance samples and acting under the
direction of or under a protocol prepared by a physician, or a licensed
health care professional acting within the professional's scope of
practice and under the direction of or under a protocol prepared by a
physician, who:
(1) obtains a blood, urine, or other bodily substance sample from
a person, regardless of whether the sample is taken for diagnostic
purposes or at the request of a law enforcement officer under this
section;
(2) performs a chemical test on blood, urine, or other bodily
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


substance obtained from a person; or
(3) searches for or retrieves contraband from the body cavity of an
individual;
shall deliver the sample or contraband or disclose the results of the test
to a law enforcement officer who requests the sample, contraband, or
results as a part of a criminal investigation. Samples, contraband, and
test results shall be provided to a law enforcement officer even if the
person has not consented to or otherwise authorized their release.
(b) A physician, a licensed health care professional, a hospital, or an
agent of a physician or hospital is not civilly or criminally liable for any
of the following:
(1) Disclosing test results in accordance with this section.
(2) Delivering contraband, or a blood, urine, or other bodily
substance sample in accordance with this section.
(3) Searching for or retrieving contraband or obtaining a blood,
urine, or other bodily substance sample in accordance with this
section.
(4) Disclosing to the prosecuting attorney or the deputy
prosecuting attorney for use at or testifying at the criminal trial of
the person as to facts observed or opinions formed.
(5) Failing to treat a person from whom contraband is retrieved or
a blood, urine, or other bodily substance sample is obtained at the
request of a law enforcement officer if the person declines
treatment.
(6) Injury to a person arising from the performance of duties in
good faith under this section. However, immunity does not apply
if the physician, licensed health care professional, hospital, or
agent of a physician or hospital acts with gross negligence or
willful or wanton misconduct.
(c) For the purposes of a criminal proceeding:
(1) the privileges arising from a patient-physician relationship do
not apply to the contraband, samples, test results, or testimony
described in this section; and
(2) contraband, samples, test results, and testimony may be
admitted in a proceeding in accordance with the applicable rules
of evidence.
(d) The exceptions to the patient-physician relationship specified in
subsection (c) do not affect those relationships in a proceeding that is
not a criminal proceeding.
(e) The contraband, test results, and samples obtained by a law
enforcement officer under subsection (a) may be disclosed only to a
prosecuting attorney or a deputy prosecuting attorney for use as
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


evidence in a criminal proceeding.
(f) This section does not require a physician or a person under the
direction of a physician to perform a chemical test or to retrieve
contraband.
(g) If the person:
(1) from whom the contraband is to be retrieved or the bodily
substance sample is to be obtained under this section does not
consent; and
(2) resists the retrieval of the contraband or the taking of a
sample;
the law enforcement officer may use reasonable force to assist an
individual, who must be authorized under this section to retrieve
contraband or obtain a sample, in the retrieval of the contraband or the
taking of the sample.
(h) The person authorized under this section to retrieve contraband
or obtain a bodily substance sample shall take the sample or retrieve
the contraband in a medically accepted manner.
(i) This subsection does not apply to contraband retrieved or a
bodily substance sample taken at a licensed hospital (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-179(a) and IC 16-18-2-179(b)). A law enforcement officer
may transport the person to a place where the contraband may be
retrieved or the sample may be obtained by any of the following
persons who are trained in retrieving contraband or obtaining bodily
substance samples and who have been engaged to retrieve contraband
or obtain samples under this section:
(1) A physician holding an unlimited license to practice medicine
or osteopathy.
(2) A registered nurse.
(3) A licensed practical nurse.
(4) An advanced emergency medical technician (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-6.5).
(5) A paramedic (as defined in IC 16-18-2-266).
(6) Except as provided in subsections (j) through (k), any other
person qualified through training, experience, or education to
retrieve contraband or obtain a bodily substance sample.
(j) A law enforcement officer may not retrieve contraband or obtain
a bodily substance sample under this section if the contraband is to be
retrieved or the sample is to be obtained from another law enforcement
officer as a result of the other law enforcement officer's involvement in
an accident or alleged crime.
(k) A law enforcement officer who is otherwise qualified to obtain
a bodily substance sample under this section may obtain a bodily
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


substance sample from a person involved in an accident or alleged
crime who is not a law enforcement officer only if:
(1) the officer obtained a bodily substance sample from an
individual as part of the officer's official duties as a law
enforcement officer; and
(2) the:
(A) person consents to the officer obtaining a bodily substance
sample; or
(B) obtaining of the bodily substance sample is authorized by
a search warrant.
(l) A physician or a person trained in obtaining bodily samples who
is acting under the direction of or under a protocol prepared by a
physician shall obtain a blood sample if the following conditions are
satisfied:
(1) A law enforcement officer requests that the sample be
obtained.
(2) The law enforcement officer has certified in writing the
following:
(A) That the officer has probable cause to believe the person
from whom the sample is to be obtained has violated
IC 9-30-5-4, IC 9-30-5-5, IC 35-46-9-6(b)(2) (before its
repeal), or IC 35-46-9-6(c) (before its repeal).
(B) That the offense resulting in a criminal investigation
described in subsection (a) occurred not more than three (3)
hours before the time the sample is requested.
(C) That exigent circumstances exist that create pressing
health, safety, or law enforcement needs that would take
priority over a warrant application.
(3) Not more than the use of reasonable force is necessary to
obtain the sample.
SECTION 6. IC 9-30-6-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.85-2013,
SECTION 93, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) If a person refuses to submit to a chemical
test, the arresting officer shall inform the person that refusal will result
in the suspension of the person's driving privileges.
(b) If a person refuses to submit to a chemical test after having been
advised that the refusal will result in the suspension of driving
privileges or submits to a chemical test that results in prima facie
evidence of intoxication, the arresting officer shall do the following:
(1) Obtain the person's driver's license or permit if the person is
in possession of the document and issue a receipt valid until the
initial hearing of the matter held under IC 35-33-7-1.
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(2) Submit a probable cause affidavit to the prosecuting attorney
of the county in which the alleged offense occurred.
SECTION 7. IC 9-30-6-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 88, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in IC 9-30-16-1(g),
whenever a judicial officer has determined that there was probable
cause to believe that a person has violated IC 9-30-5, IC 35-46-9
(before its repeal), or IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal), the clerk of the
court shall forward, in a form and manner prescribed by the bureau:
(1) a paper copy of the affidavit, or an electronic substitute; or
(2) a bureau certificate as described in section 16 of this chapter;
to the bureau at the conclusion of the initial hearing held under
subsection (c). IC 35-33-7-1, or if the initial hearing was waived,
upon notice of waiver of the initial hearing.
(b) The probable cause affidavit required under section 7(b)(2) 7(2)
of this chapter must do the following:
(1) Set forth the grounds for the arresting officer's belief that there
was probable cause that the arrested person was operating a
vehicle in violation of IC 9-30-5 or a motorboat in violation of
IC 35-46-9 (before its repeal) or IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal).
(2) State that the person was arrested for a violation of IC 9-30-5
or operating a motorboat in violation of IC 35-46-9 (before its
repeal) or IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal).
(3) State whether the person:
(A) refused to submit to a chemical test when offered; or
(B) submitted to a chemical test that resulted in prima facie
evidence that the person was intoxicated.
(4) Be sworn to by the arresting officer.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), if it is determined under
subsection (a) that there was probable cause to believe that a person
has violated IC 9-30-5, IC 35-46-9, or IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal), at
the initial hearing of the matter held under IC 35-33-7-1 the court shall
recommend immediate suspension of the person's driving privileges to
take effect on the date the order is entered, and forward to the bureau
a copy of the order recommending immediate suspension of driving
privileges.
(d) (c) If it is determined under subsection (a) that there is probable
cause to believe that a person violated IC 9-30-5 IC 9-30-5-1(a) or
IC 9-30-5-1(b), the court may as an alternative to any suspension of the
person's driving privileges under subsection (c), issue an order
recommending that the person be prohibited from operating a motor
vehicle unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


certified ignition interlock device under IC 9-30-8. This subsection
applies even if the probable cause affidavit in subsection (b) states that
the person:
(1) refused to submit to a chemical test; or
(2) submitted to a chemical test that resulted in prima facie
evidence that the person was intoxicated; or
(3) was also charged under 9-30-5-2.
The order remains in effect until the bureau is notified by a court that
the criminal charges against the person have been resolved. When the
court issues an order under this subsection, no administrative
suspension is imposed by the bureau and no suspension is noted on the
person's driving record.
(e) (d) A person commits a Class B infraction if the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
ignition interlock device; and
(2) is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle unless the motor
vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified ignition interlock
device under subsection (d). (c).
(f) (e) A person commits a Class B misdemeanor if the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
ignition interlock device; and
(2) knows the person is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle
unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified
ignition interlock device under subsection (d). (c).
SECTION 8. IC 9-30-6-8.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2024,
SECTION 46, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. If the bureau receives an order recommending
use of an ignition interlock device under section 8(d) 8(c) of this
chapter, the bureau shall immediately do the following:
(1) Mail notice to the person's address contained in the records of
the bureau, or send notice electronically if the person has
indicated a preference for receiving notices from the bureau
electronically, stating that the person may not operate a motor
vehicle unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning
certified ignition interlock device under IC 9-30-8 commencing:
(A) five (5) days after the date of the notice; or
(B) on the date the court enters an order recommending use of
an ignition interlock device;
whichever occurs first.
(2) Notify the person of the right to a judicial review under
section 10 of this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 9-30-6-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


2026]. Sec. 9. (a) This section does not apply if an ignition interlock
device order is issued under section 8(d) of this chapter.
(b) If the affidavit under section 8(b) of this chapter states that a
person refused to submit to a chemical test, the bureau shall suspend
the driving privileges of the person:
(1) for:
(A) one (1) year; or
(B) if the person has at least one (1) previous conviction for
operating while intoxicated, two (2) years; or
(2) until the suspension is ordered terminated under IC 9-30-5.
(c) If the affidavit under section 8(b) of this chapter states that a
chemical test resulted in prima facie evidence that a person was
intoxicated, the bureau shall suspend the driving privileges of the
person:
(1) for one hundred eighty (180) days; or
(2) until the bureau is notified by a court that the charges have
been disposed of;
whichever occurs first.
(d) Whenever the bureau is required to suspend a person's driving
privileges under this section, the bureau shall immediately do the
following:
(1) Mail notice to the person's address contained in the records of
the bureau, or send the notice electronically if the person has
indicated a preference for receiving notices from the bureau
electronically, stating that the person's driving privileges will be
suspended for a specified period, commencing:
(A) seven (7) days after the date of the notice; or
(B) on the date the court enters an order recommending
suspension of the person's driving privileges under section 8(c)
of this chapter;
whichever occurs first.
(2) Notify the person of the right to a judicial review under
section 10 of this chapter.
SECTION 10. IC 9-30-6-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2005,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A person against whom an ignition
interlock device order has been issued under section 8.5 of this chapter
or whose driving privileges have been suspended under section 9 of
this chapter is entitled to a prompt judicial hearing. The person may file
a petition that requests a hearing:
(1) in the court where the charges with respect to the person's
operation of a vehicle are pending; or
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(2) if charges with respect to the person's operation of a vehicle
have not been filed, in any court of the county where the alleged
offense or refusal occurred that has jurisdiction over crimes
committed in violation of IC 9-30-5.
(b) The petition for review must:
(1) be in writing;
(2) be verified by the person seeking review; and
(3) allege specific facts that contradict the facts alleged in the
probable cause affidavit.
(c) The hearing under this section shall be limited to the following
issues:
(1) Whether the arresting law enforcement officer had probable
cause to believe that the person was operating a vehicle in
violation of IC 9-30-5.
(2) Whether the person refused to submit to a chemical test
offered by a law enforcement officer.
(d) If the court finds
(1) that there was no probable cause or
(2) that the person's driving privileges were suspended under
section 9(b) of this chapter and that the person did not refuse to
submit to a chemical test;
the court shall order the bureau to rescind the ignition interlock device
requirement. or reinstate the person's driving privileges.
(e) The prosecuting attorney of the county in which a petition has
been filed under this chapter shall represent the state on relation of the
bureau with respect to the petition.
(f) The petitioner has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(g) The court's order is a final judgment appealable in the manner
of civil actions by either party. The attorney general shall represent the
state on relation of the bureau with respect to the appeal.
SECTION 11. IC 9-30-6-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter, IC 9-30-5, or IC 9-30-9, the court
shall order the bureau to rescind an ignition interlock device
requirement or reinstate the driving privileges of a person if:
(1) all of the charges under IC 9-30-5 have been dismissed and
the prosecuting attorney states on the record that no charges will
be refiled against the person;
(2) the court finds the allegations in a petition filed by a defendant
under section 18 of this chapter are true; or
(3) the person:
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(A) did not refuse to submit to a chemical test offered as a
result of a law enforcement officer having probable cause to
believe the person committed the offense charged; and
(B) has been found not guilty of all charges by a court or by a
jury.
(b) The court's order must contain findings of fact establishing that
the requirements for reinstatement described in subsection (a) have
been met.
(c) A person whose driving privileges are reinstated under this
section is not required to pay a reinstatement fee.
SECTION 12. IC 9-30-6-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.149-2015,
SECTION 105, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) If a court recommends
suspension of driving privileges under this chapter, IC 9-30-5 or
IC 9-30-9, the bureau shall fix the period of suspension in accordance
with the recommendation of the court. If the court fails to recommend
a fixed period of suspension, or recommends a fixed term that is less
than the minimum term required by statute, the bureau shall impose the
minimum period of suspension required by statute.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), during the three (3) years
following the termination of the suspension the person's driving
privileges remain suspended until the person provides proof of future
financial responsibility in force under IC 9-25.
(c) If a court recommends suspension of a person's driving
privileges for a conviction under IC 9-30-5, during the three (3) years
following the termination of the suspension the person's driving
privileges remain suspended until the person provides proof of future
financial responsibility in force under IC 9-25. However, if a court
recommends suspension of the driving privileges under IC 9-30-5 of a
person who is arrested for or charged with an offense committed under
IC 9-30-5, the person is not required to provide proof of future
financial responsibility under IC 9-25 unless and until the person is
convicted under IC 9-30-5.
(d) If at any time during the three (3) years following the
termination of the suspension imposed under subsection (a) a person
who has provided proof of future financial responsibility under IC 9-25
fails to maintain the proof, the bureau shall suspend the person's
driving privileges until the person again provides proof of future
financial responsibility under IC 9-25.
SECTION 13. IC 9-30-6-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.125-2012,
SECTION 347, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. If a court orders the bureau to
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


rescind an ignition interlock device requirement or reinstate a person's
driving privileges under this article, the bureau shall comply with the
order. Unless the order for reinstatement is issued under section
11(a)(2) of this chapter, The bureau shall also do the following:
(1) remove any record of the ignition interlock device requirement
or suspension from the official driving record of the person.
(2) Reinstate the privileges without cost to the person.
SECTION 14. IC 9-30-6-13.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 13.5. If:
(1) a case filed under IC 9-30-5 is terminated in favor of the
defendant; and
(2) the defendant's driving privileges were suspended under:
(A) section 9(b) of this chapter; or
(B) section 9(c) of this chapter;
the bureau shall remove any record of the suspension, including the
reason for suspension, from the defendant's official driving record.
SECTION 15. IC 9-30-6-18, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2005,
SECTION 41, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) A person against whom an ignition
interlock device order has been issued under section 8.5 of this chapter
or whose driving privileges have been suspended under section 9(c) of
this chapter is entitled to rescission of the ignition interlock device
requirement or reinstatement of driving privileges if the following
occur:
(1) After a request for an early trial is made by the person at the
initial hearing on the charges, a trial or other disposition of the
charges for which the person was arrested under IC 9-30-5 is not
held within ninety (90) days after the date of the person's initial
hearing on the charges.
(2) The delay in trial or disposition of the charges is not due to the
person arrested under IC 9-30-5.
(b) A person who desires rescission of the ignition interlock device
requirement or reinstatement of driving privileges under this section
must file a verified petition in the court where the charges against the
petitioner are pending. The petition must allege the following:
(1) The date of the petitioner's arrest under IC 9-30-5.
(2) The date of the petitioner's initial hearing on the charges filed
against the petitioner under IC 9-30-5.
(3) The date set for trial or other disposition of the matter.
(4) A statement averring the following:
(A) That the petitioner requested an early trial of the matter at
the petitioner's initial hearing on the charges filed against the
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


petitioner under IC 9-30-5.
(B) The trial or disposition date set by the court is at least
ninety (90) days after the date of the petitioner's initial hearing
on the charges filed against the petitioner under IC 9-30-5.
(C) The delay in the trial or disposition is not due to the
petitioner.
(c) Upon the filing of a petition under this section, the court shall
immediately examine the record of the court to determine whether the
allegations in the petition are true.
(d) If the court finds the allegations of a petition filed under this
section are true, the court shall order rescission of the ignition interlock
device requirement or reinstatement of the petitioner's driving
privileges under section 11 of this chapter. The reinstatement must not
take effect until ninety (90) days after the date of the petitioner's initial
hearing.
SECTION 16. IC 9-30-7-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this
chapter, "portable breath test" means a hand held apparatus that
measures the alcohol concentration in a breath sample delivered by a
person into the mouthpiece of the apparatus.
(b) As used in this chapter, "fatal accident" means an accident, a
collision, or other occurrence that involves at least one (1) vehicle and
that results in:
(1) death; or
(2) bodily injury that gives a law enforcement officer reason to
believe that the death of at least one (1) person is imminent.
(c) As used in this chapter, "roadside chemical test" means a
portable chemical test that can be administered by the side of a
road.
SECTION 17. IC 9-30-7-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. A person who
operates a vehicle impliedly consents to submit to the portable breath
test, roadside chemical test, or chemical test under this chapter as a
condition of operating a vehicle in Indiana. A person must submit to
each portable breath test, roadside chemical test, or chemical test
offered by a law enforcement officer under this chapter to comply with
this chapter.
SECTION 18. IC 9-30-7-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A law
enforcement officer shall offer a portable breath test, roadside
chemical test, or chemical test to any person who the officer has
reason to believe operated a vehicle that was involved in a fatal
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


accident or an accident involving serious bodily injury. If:
(1) the results of a portable breath test indicate the presence of
alcohol;
(2) the results of a portable breath test do not indicate the
presence of alcohol but the law enforcement officer has probable
cause to believe the person is under the influence of a controlled
substance or another drug; or
(3) the person refuses to submit to a portable breath test; or
(4) the roadside chemical test indicates the presence of a
controlled substance;
the law enforcement officer shall offer a chemical test to the person.
(b) A law enforcement officer may offer a person more than one (1)
portable breath test, roadside chemical test, or chemical test under this
section. However, all chemical tests must be administered within three
(3) hours after the fatal accident or the accident involving serious
bodily injury.
(c) It is not necessary for a law enforcement officer to offer a
portable breath test, roadside chemical test, or chemical test to an
unconscious person.
(d) If a roadside chemical test is not available under subsection
(a), the officer may offer a chemical test.
SECTION 19. IC 9-30-8-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.71-2016,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. The bureau and the Indiana criminal justice
institute shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to administer
this chapter and IC 9-30-6-8(d). IC 9-30-6-8(c).
SECTION 20. IC 9-30-9-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) If the court enters
an order conditionally deferring charges under section 3 of this chapter,
the court may do the following:
(1) Suspend the person's driving privileges for at least two (2)
years but not more than four (4) years.
(2) impose other appropriate conditions, including the payment of
fees imposed under section 8 of this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 9-30-6-9, the defendant may be granted
probationary driving privileges only after the defendant's license has
been suspended for at least one (1) year.
(c) (b) The court may as an alternative to a license suspension under
subsection (a)(1), issue an order prohibiting the defendant from
operating a motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a
functioning certified ignition interlock device under IC 9-30-8. An
order requiring an ignition interlock device must remain in effect for
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


at least two (2) years but not more than four (4) years.
SECTION 21. IC 9-30-9-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) If the court refers
a defendant to the program under section 6 of this chapter, the court
may do the following:
(1) Suspend the defendant's driving privileges for at least ninety
(90) days but not more than four (4) years.
(2) Impose other appropriate conditions.
(b) The defendant may be granted probationary driving privileges
only after the defendant's license has been suspended for at least thirty
(30) days under IC 9-30-6-9.
(c) (b) The court may, as an alternative to a license suspension
under subsection (a)(1), issue an order prohibiting the defendant from
operating a motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a
functioning certified ignition interlock device under IC 9-30-8. An
order requiring an ignition interlock device must remain in effect for
at least two (2) years but not more than four (4) years.
SECTION 22. IC 9-30-9-7.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2005,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) A person commits a Class B infraction if
the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
ignition interlock device; and
(2) is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle unless the motor
vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified ignition interlock
device under section 5(c) 5(b) or 7(c) 7(b) of this chapter.
(b) A person commits a Class B misdemeanor if the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
ignition interlock device; and
(2) knows the person is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle
unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified
ignition interlock device under section 5(c) 5(b) or 7(c) 7(b) of
this chapter.
SECTION 23. IC 9-30-10-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A person who has accumulated at least two
(2) judgments within a ten (10) year period for any of the following
violations, singularly or in combination, and not arising out of the same
incident, is a habitual violator:
(1) Reckless homicide resulting from the operation of a motor
vehicle.
(2) Voluntary or involuntary manslaughter resulting from the
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


operation of a motor vehicle.
(3) Failure of the operator of a motor vehicle involved in an
accident resulting in death or injury to any person to stop at the
scene of the accident and give the required information and
assistance.
(4) Operation of a vehicle while intoxicated resulting in death.
(5) Before July 1, 1997, operation of a vehicle with at least
ten-hundredths percent (0.10%) alcohol in the blood resulting in
death.
(6) After June 30, 1997, and before July 1, 2001, operation of a
vehicle with an alcohol concentration equivalent to at least
ten-hundredths (0.10) gram of alcohol per:
(A) one hundred (100) milliliters of the blood; or
(B) two hundred ten (210) liters of the breath;
resulting in death.
(7) After June 30, 2001, operation of a vehicle with an alcohol
concentration equivalent to at least eight-hundredths (0.08) gram
of alcohol per:
(A) one hundred (100) milliliters of the blood; or
(B) two hundred ten (210) liters of the breath;
resulting in death.
(8) After June 30, 2001, operation of a motor vehicle with a
schedule I or schedule II controlled substance in the blood
resulting in death.
(b) A person who has accumulated at least three (3) judgments
within a ten (10) year period for any of the following violations,
singularly or in combination, and not arising out of the same incident,
is a habitual violator:
(1) Operation of a vehicle while intoxicated.
(2) Before July 1, 1997, operation of a vehicle with at least
ten-hundredths percent (0.10%) alcohol in the blood.
(3) After June 30, 1997, and before July 1, 2001, operation of a
vehicle with an alcohol concentration equivalent to at least
ten-hundredths (0.10) gram of alcohol per:
(A) one hundred (100) milliliters of the blood; or
(B) two hundred ten (210) liters of the breath.
(4) After June 30, 2001, operation of a vehicle with an alcohol
concentration equivalent to at least eight-hundredths (0.08) gram
of alcohol per:
(A) one hundred (100) milliliters of the blood; or
(B) two hundred ten (210) liters of the breath.
(5) Reckless driving.
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(6) Criminal recklessness as a felony involving the operation of
a motor vehicle.
(7) Drag racing or engaging in a speed contest in violation of law.
(8) Violating IC 9-4-1-40 (repealed July 1, 1991), IC 9-4-1-46
(repealed July 1, 1991), IC 9-26-1-1(1) (repealed January 1,
2015), IC 9-26-1-1(2) (repealed January 1, 2015), IC 9-26-1-2(1)
(repealed January 1, 2015), IC 9-26-1-2(2) (repealed January 1,
2015), IC 9-26-1-3 (repealed January 1, 2015), IC 9-26-1-4
(repealed January 1, 2015), or IC 9-26-1-1.1.
(9) Resisting law enforcement with a vehicle under:
(A) IC 35-44.1-3-1(c)(1);
(B) IC 35-44.1-3-1(c)(2)(C);
(C) IC 35-44.1-3-1(c)(3);
(D) IC 35-44.1-3-1(c)(4); or
(E) IC 35-44.1-3-1(c)(5).
(10) Any felony under this title or any felony in which the
operation of a motor vehicle is an element of the offense.
(11) After June 30, 2001, operation of a motor vehicle with a
schedule I or schedule II controlled substance in the blood.
A judgment for a violation enumerated in subsection (a) shall be added
to the violations described in this subsection for the purposes of this
subsection.
(c) A person who has accumulated at least ten (10) judgments
within a ten (10) year period for any traffic violation, except a parking
or an equipment violation, of the type required to be reported to the
bureau, singularly or in combination, and not arising out of the same
incident, is a habitual violator. However, at least one (1) of the
judgments must be for:
(1) a violation enumerated in subsection (a);
(2) a violation enumerated in subsection (b);
(3) operating a motor vehicle while the person's license to do so
has been suspended or revoked as a result of the person's
conviction of an offense under IC 9-1-4-52 (repealed July 1,
1991), IC 9-24-18-5(b) (repealed July 1, 2000), IC 9-24-19-2, or
IC 9-24-19-3; or
(4) operating a motor vehicle without ever having obtained a
license to do so.
A judgment for a violation enumerated in subsection (a) or (b) shall be
added to the judgments described in this subsection for the purposes of
this subsection.
(d) For purposes of this section, a judgment includes a judgment in
any other jurisdiction in which the elements of the offense for which
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


the conviction was entered are substantially similar to the elements of
the offenses described in subsections (a), (b), and (c).
(e) For purposes of this section, the offense date is used when
determining the number of judgments accumulated within a ten (10)
year period.
SECTION 24. IC 9-30-16-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 90, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the
following are ineligible for specialized driving privileges under this
chapter:
(1) A person who has never been an Indiana resident.
(2) A person seeking specialized driving privileges with respect
to a suspension based on the person's refusal to submit to a
chemical test offered under IC 9-30-6 or IC 9-30-7. However, a
court may grant this person driving privileges under
IC 9-30-6-8(d).
(3) (2) A person whose driving privileges have been suspended or
revoked under IC 9-24-10-7(b)(2)(A).
(4) (3) A person whose driving privileges have been suspended
under IC 9-21-8-52(e) or IC 9-21-12-1(b).
(b) This chapter applies to the following:
(1) A person who held a driver's license (issued under IC 9-24-3),
or a commercial driver's, a public passenger chauffeur's, or a
chauffeur's license at the time of:
(A) the criminal conviction for which the operation of a motor
vehicle is an element of the offense;
(B) any criminal conviction for an offense under IC 9-30-5,
IC 35-46-9 (before its repeal), or IC 14-15-8 (before its
repeal); or
(C) committing the infraction of exceeding a worksite speed
limit for the second time in one (1) year under IC 9-21-5-11(f).
(2) A person who:
(A) has never held a valid Indiana driver's license or does not
currently hold a valid Indiana learner's permit; and
(B) was an Indiana resident when the driving privileges for
which the person is seeking specialized driving privileges
were suspended.
(c) Except as specifically provided in this chapter, a court may
suspend the driving privileges of a person convicted of any of the
following offenses for a period up to the maximum allowable period of
incarceration under the penalty for the offense:
(1) Any criminal conviction in which the operation of a motor
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


vehicle is an element of the offense.
(2) Any criminal conviction for an offense under IC 9-30-5,
IC 35-46-9 (before its repeal), or IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal).
(3) Any offense under IC 35-42-1, IC 35-42-2, or IC 35-44.1-3-1
that involves the use of a vehicle.
(d) Except as provided in section 3.5 of this chapter, a suspension
of driving privileges under this chapter may begin before the
conviction. Multiple suspensions of driving privileges ordered by a
court that are part of the same episode of criminal conduct shall be
served concurrently. A court may grant credit time for any suspension
that began before the conviction. except as prohibited by section
6(a)(2) of this chapter.
(e) If a person has had an ignition interlock device installed as a
condition of specialized driving privileges or under IC 9-30-6-8(d),
IC 9-30-6-8(c), the period of the installation shall be credited as part
of the suspension of driving privileges.
(f) This subsection applies to a person described in subsection
(b)(2). A court shall, as a condition of granting specialized driving
privileges to the person, require the person to apply for and obtain an
Indiana driver's license.
(g) If a person indicates to the court at an initial hearing (as
described in IC 35-33-7) that the person intends to file a petition for a
specialized driving privileges hearing with that court under section 3
or 4 of this chapter, the following apply:
(1) The court shall:
(A) stay the suspension of the person's driving privileges at the
initial hearing and shall not submit the probable cause
affidavit related to the person's offense to the bureau; and
(B) set the matter for a specialized driving privileges hearing
not later than thirty (30) days after the initial hearing.
(2) If the person does not file a petition for a specialized driving
privileges hearing not later than ten (10) days after the date of the
initial hearing, the court shall lift the stay of the suspension of the
person's driving privileges and shall submit the probable cause
affidavit related to the person's offense to the bureau for
automatic suspension.
(3) If the person files a petition for a specialized driving privileges
hearing not later than ten (10) days after the initial hearing, the
stay of the suspension of the person's driving privileges continues
until the matter is heard and a determination is made by the court
at the specialized driving privileges hearing.
(4) If the specialized driving privileges hearing is continued due
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


to:
(A) a congestion of the court calendar;
(B) the prosecuting attorney's motion for a continuance; or
(C) the person's motion for a continuance with no objection by
the prosecuting attorney;
the stay of the suspension of the person's driving privileges
continues until addressed at the next hearing.
(5) If the person moves for a continuance of the specialized
driving privileges hearing and the court grants the continuance
over the prosecuting attorney's objection, the court shall lift the
stay of the suspension of the person's driving privileges and shall
submit the probable cause affidavit related to the person's offense
to the bureau for automatic suspension.
Nothing in this subsection prevents an otherwise eligible individual
from applying for a specialized driving privilege after the initial
hearing.
SECTION 25. IC 9-30-16-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.29-2020,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) This section does not apply to specialized
driving privileges granted in accordance with section 3.5 of this
chapter. If a court orders a suspension of driving privileges under this
chapter, or imposes a suspension of driving privileges under
IC 9-30-6-9(c), the court may stay the suspension and grant a
specialized driving privilege as set forth in this section.
(b) An individual who seeks specialized driving privileges must file
a petition for specialized driving privileges in each court that has
ordered or imposed a suspension of the individual's driving privileges.
Each petition must:
(1) be verified by the petitioner;
(2) state the petitioner's age, date of birth, and address;
(3) state the grounds for relief and the relief sought;
(4) be filed in the court case that resulted in the order of
suspension; and
(5) be served on the bureau and the prosecuting attorney.
A prosecuting attorney shall appear on behalf of the bureau to respond
to a petition filed under this subsection.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (h), regardless of the
underlying offense, specialized driving privileges granted under this
section shall be granted for a period of time as determined by the court.
A court, at its discretion, may set periodic review hearings to review an
individual's specialized driving privileges.
(d) The terms of specialized driving privileges must be determined
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


by a court.
(e) A stay of a suspension and specialized driving privileges may
not be granted to an individual who:
(1) has previously been granted specialized driving privileges;
and
(2) has more than one (1) conviction under section 5 of this
chapter.
(f) An individual who has been granted specialized driving
privileges shall:
(1) maintain proof of future financial responsibility insurance
during the period of specialized driving privileges;
(2) carry a copy of the order granting specialized driving
privileges or have the order in the vehicle being operated by the
individual;
(3) produce the copy of the order granting specialized driving
privileges upon the request of a police officer; and
(4) carry a validly issued state identification card or driver's
license.
(g) An individual who holds a commercial driver's license and has
been granted specialized driving privileges under this chapter may not,
for the duration of the suspension for which the specialized driving
privileges are sought, operate any vehicle that requires the individual
to hold a commercial driver's license to operate the vehicle.
(h) Whenever a suspension of an individual's driving privileges
under this chapter is terminated because:
(1) the underlying conviction, judgment, or finding that forms the
basis of the suspension is reversed, vacated, or dismissed; or
(2) the individual is acquitted of, found not liable for, or otherwise
found not to have committed the underlying act or offense that
forms the basis of the suspension;
the individual's specialized driving privileges expire at the time the
suspension of the individual's driving privileges is terminated.
(i) The court shall inform the bureau of a termination of a
suspension and expiration of specialized driving privileges as described
under subsection (h) in a format designated by the bureau.
SECTION 26. IC 9-30-16-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 6. (a) A person whose driving privileges are suspended
under section 1(c) of this chapter:
(1) is entitled to credit for any days during which the license was
suspended under IC 9-30-6-9(c); and
(2) may not receive any credit for days during which the person's
driving privileges were suspended under IC 9-30-6-9(b).
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(b) A period of suspension of driving privileges imposed under
section 1(c) of this chapter must be consecutive to any period of
suspension imposed under IC 9-30-6-9(b). However, if the state and
defendant agree pursuant to a term in an accepted plea agreement, or
if the court finds at sentencing that it is in the best interest of society,
the court shall terminate all or any part of the remaining suspension
under IC 9-30-6-9(b) and shall enter this finding in its sentencing
order.
(c) The bureau shall designate a period of suspension of driving
privileges imposed under section 1(c) of this chapter as consecutive to
any period of suspension imposed under IC 9-30-6-9(b) unless the
sentencing order of the court under subsection (b) terminates all or part
of the remaining suspension under IC 9-30-6-9(b).
SECTION 27. IC 9-30-16-6.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.110-2020,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. A court and the bureau, if applicable, shall
terminate all or any part of the remaining suspension of a person's
license suspension under section 1(c) of this chapter or under
IC 9-30-6-9 if:
(1) the charges against the person are dismissed;
(2) the person is acquitted; or
(3) the person's conviction is vacated or reversed on appeal.
SECTION 28. IC 12-23-5-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Subject to
subsection (b), if a court enters an order conditionally deferring charges
that involve a violation of IC 9-30-5, the court shall do the following:
(1) Suspend the defendant's driving privileges for at least ninety
(90) days but not more than two (2) years.
(2) Impose other appropriate conditions.
(b) A defendant may be granted probationary driving privileges only
after the defendant's license has been suspended for at least thirty (30)
days under IC 9-30-6-9.
(c) (b) If a defendant has at least one (1) conviction for an offense
under IC 9-30-5, the order granting probationary driving privileges
under subsection (b) must, in a county that provides for the installation
of an ignition interlock device under IC 9-30-8, prohibit the defendant
from operating a motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is equipped
with a functioning certified ignition interlock device under IC 9-30-8.
(d) (c) If a defendant does not have a prior conviction for an offense
under IC 9-30-5, the court may, as an alternative to a license
suspension under subsection (a)(1), issue an order prohibiting the
defendant from operating a motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


equipped with a functioning certified ignition interlock device under
IC 9-30-8. An order requiring an ignition interlock device must remain
in effect for at least two (2) years but not more than four (4) years.
SECTION 29. IC 12-23-5-5.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) A person
commits a Class B infraction if the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
ignition interlock device; and
(2) is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle unless the motor
vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified ignition interlock
device under section 5(d) 5(c) of this chapter.
(b) A person commits a Class B misdemeanor if the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
ignition interlock device; and
(2) knows the person is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle
unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified
ignition interlock device under section 5(d) 5(c) of this chapter.
SECTION 30. IC 14-15-4-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2014,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. A person who knowingly or intentionally
violates section 1, 2, or 3 of this chapter commits a Class C
misdemeanor. However, the offense is:
(1) a Class A misdemeanor if the accident or collision results in
an injury to a person;
(2) a Level 6 felony if:
(A) the accident or collision results in serious bodily injury to
a person; or
(B) within the five (5) years preceding the commission of the
offense, the person had a previous conviction of any of the
offenses listed in IC 9-30-10-4(a), IC 35-46-9-6 (before its
repeal), or IC 14-15-8-8 (before its repeal); or
(3) a Level 5 felony if the accident or collision results in the death
of a person.
SECTION 31. IC 14-15-11-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.217-2014,
SECTION 182, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) A court may suspend or
revoke the driver's license of a person upon the conviction of the
person of a crime based on a violation of IC 14-15-3, IC 14-15-8
(before its repeal), IC 35-46-9 (before its repeal), or IC 14-15-12.
(b) In suspending or revoking a driver's license under this section,
the court shall notify the bureau of the driver's license suspension or
revocation, and the bureau shall follow the procedure set forth in
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


IC 9-30-4.
SECTION 32. IC 14-15-11-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2012,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) A court in which an individual is convicted
of a crime based on a violation of IC 14-15-3, IC 35-46-9 (before its
repeal), IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal), or IC 14-15-12 relating to the
operation of a motorboat shall forward a certified abstract of the record
of the conviction to the bureau.
(b) If, in the opinion of the court, an individual referred to in
subsection (a) should be deprived of the privilege of operating a
vehicle or motorboat, the court shall recommend the suspension of the
Indiana driver's license issued to the individual for a fixed period. The
period of the suspension shall be established by the court but may not
exceed one (1) year.
(c) Upon receiving the recommendation of the court under
subsection (b), the bureau shall suspend the individual's license for the
period recommended by the court.
(d) A certified abstract forwarded to the bureau under subsection
(a):
(1) must be in the form prescribed by the bureau; and
(2) shall be accepted by an administrative agency or a court as
prima facie evidence of the conviction and all other action stated
in the abstract.
SECTION 33. IC 14-15-11-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2012,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) For purposes of the point system for
Indiana traffic convictions operated by the bureau under 140 IAC 1-4.5,
the bureau shall assess points against a person who commits a crime by
operating a motorboat in violation of:
(1) IC 14-15-3;
(2) IC 35-46-9 (before its repeal) (or or IC 14-15-8 before
(before its repeal); or
(3) IC 14-15-12.
(b) The bureau shall assess points against a person under this
section for each crime referred to in subsection (a) that is committed by
the person.
(c) The point study committee appointed by the commissioner under
140 IAC 1-4.5-3, in consultation with the department, shall determine
the number of points assessed under subsection (a) for each type of
criminal violation of IC 14-15-3, IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal),
IC 35-46-9 (before its repeal), or IC 14-15-12 based on the evaluation
by the committee of the danger to human life, human physical safety,
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


and property posed by the violation.
SECTION 34. IC 14-15-12-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2012,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The requirements and prohibitions set forth in
this chapter concerning personal watercraft are in addition to the
requirements and prohibitions set forth in IC 14-15-3, IC 35-46-9
(before its repeal), and IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal).
SECTION 35. IC 14-15-13-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2012,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The requirements and prohibitions set forth in
this chapter are in addition to the requirements and prohibitions set
forth in IC 14-15-2, IC 14-15-3, IC 14-15-4, 14-15-8 (before its repeal),
IC 35-46-9 (before its repeal), and IC 14-15-12.
SECTION 36. IC 31-9-2-84.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2020,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 84.8. "Nonwaivable offense", for purposes of this
title, means a conviction of any of the following felonies:
(1) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(2) Causing suicide (IC 35-42-1-2).
(3) Assisting suicide (IC 35-42-1-2.5).
(4) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(5) Involuntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-4).
(6) Reckless homicide (IC 35-42-1-5).
(7) Feticide (IC 35-42-1-6).
(8) Battery (IC 35-42-2-1) within the past five (5) years.
(9) Domestic battery (IC 35-42-2-1.3).
(10) Aggravated battery (IC 35-42-2-1.5).
(11) Criminal recklessness (IC 35-42-2-2) within the past five (5)
years.
(12) Strangulation (IC 35-42-2-9).
(13) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2).
(14) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3) within the past five (5)
years.
(15) Human and sexual trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5).
(16) A felony sex offense under IC 35-42-4.
(17) Arson (IC 35-43-1-1) within the past five (5) years.
(18) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(19) Neglect of a dependent (IC 35-46-1-4(a) and
IC 35-46-1-4(b)).
(20) Child selling (IC 35-46-1-4(d)).
(21) Reckless supervision (IC 35-46-1-4.1).
(22) Nonsupport of a dependent child (IC 35-46-1-5) within the
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


past five (5) years.
(23) Operating a motorboat while intoxicated (IC 35-46-9-6)
(before its repeal) within the past five (5) years.
(24) A felony involving a weapon under IC 35-47 within the past
five (5) years.
(25) A felony relating to controlled substances under IC 35-48-4
within the past five (5) years.
(26) An offense relating to material or a performance that is
harmful to minors or obscene under IC 35-49-3.
(27) A felony under IC 9-30-5 within the past five (5) years.
(28) A felony related to the health or safety of a child (as defined
in IC 31-9-2-13(h)) or an endangered adult (as defined in
IC 12-10-3-2).
SECTION 37. IC 31-19-11-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 282, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Whenever the court has heard
the evidence and finds that:
(1) the adoption requested is in the best interest of the child;
(2) the petitioner or petitioners for adoption are of sufficient
ability to rear the child and furnish suitable support and
education;
(3) the report of the investigation and recommendation under
IC 31-19-8-5 has been filed;
(4) the attorney or agency arranging an adoption has filed with the
court an affidavit prepared by the Indiana department of health
under IC 31-19-5-16 indicating whether a man is entitled to notice
of the adoption because the man has registered with the putative
father registry in accordance with IC 31-19-5;
(5) proper notice arising under subdivision (4), if notice is
necessary, of the adoption has been given;
(6) the attorney or agency has filed with the court an affidavit
prepared by the Indiana department of health under:
(A) IC 31-19-6 indicating whether a record of a paternity
determination; or
(B) IC 16-37-2-2(g) indicating whether a paternity affidavit
executed under IC 16-37-2-2.1;
has been filed in relation to the child;
(7) proper consent, if consent is necessary, to the adoption has
been given;
(8) the petitioner for adoption is not prohibited from adopting the
child as the result of an inappropriate criminal history described
in subsection (c) or (d); and
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(9) the person, licensed child placing agency, or local office that
has placed the child for adoption has provided the documents and
other information required under IC 31-19-17 to the prospective
adoptive parents;
the court shall grant the petition for adoption and enter an adoption
decree.
(b) A court may not grant an adoption unless the Indiana department
of health's affidavit under IC 31-19-5-16 is filed with the court as
provided under subsection (a)(4).
(c) A juvenile adjudication for an act listed in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that
would be a felony if committed by an adult, a conviction of a
misdemeanor related to the health and safety of a child, or a conviction
of a felony not listed in IC 31-9-2-84.8 by a petitioner for adoption or
household member is a permissible basis for the court to deny the
petition for adoption. In addition, the court may not grant an adoption
if a petitioner for adoption has been convicted of a nonwaivable offense
under IC 31-9-2-84.8. However, the court is not prohibited from
granting an adoption based upon a felony conviction for:
(1) a felony under IC 9-30-5;
(2) battery (IC 35-42-2-1);
(3) criminal recklessness (IC 35-42-2-2) as a felony;
(4) criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3);
(5) arson (IC 35-43-1-1);
(6) nonsupport of a dependent child (IC 35-46-1-5);
(7) operating a motorboat while intoxicated (IC 35-46-9-6)
(before its repeal) as a felony;
(8) a felony involving a weapon under IC 35-47; or
(9) a felony relating to controlled substances under IC 35-48-4;
if the date of the conviction did not occur within the immediately
preceding five (5) year period.
(d) A court may not grant an adoption if the petitioner is a sex or
violent offender (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5) or a sexually violent
predator (as defined in IC 35-38-1-7.5).
(e) In addition to this section, section 1.1 of this chapter applies
when one (1) or more petitioners is a person with a disability.
SECTION 38. IC 31-34-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 159, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) If a child alleged to be a child
in need of services is taken into custody under an order of the court
under this chapter and the court orders out-of-home placement, the
department is responsible for that placement and care and must
consider placing the child with a:
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(1) suitable and willing relative; or
(2) de facto custodian;
before considering any other out-of-home placement.
(b) The department shall consider placing a child described in
subsection (a) with a relative related by blood, marriage, or adoption
before considering any other placement of the child.
(c) Before the department places a child in need of services with a
relative or a de facto custodian, the department shall complete an
evaluation based on a home visit of the relative's home.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (f), before placing a child in
need of services in an out-of-home placement, the department shall
conduct a criminal history check of each person who is currently
residing in the location designated as the out-of-home placement.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (g), the department may not
make an out-of-home placement if a person described in subsection (d)
has:
(1) committed an act resulting in a substantiated report of child
abuse or neglect; or
(2) been convicted of a nonwaivable offense, as defined in
IC 31-9-2-84.8 or had a juvenile adjudication for an act that
would be a nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if
committed by an adult.
(f) The department is not required to conduct a criminal history
check under subsection (d) if the department makes an out-of-home
placement to an entity or a facility that is not a residence (as defined in
IC 3-5-2.1-90) or that is licensed by the state.
(g) A court may order or the department may approve an
out-of-home placement if:
(1) a person described in subsection (d) has:
(A) committed an act resulting in a substantiated report of
child abuse or neglect;
(B) been convicted of:
(i) battery (IC 35-42-2-1);
(ii) criminal recklessness (IC 35-42-2-2) as a felony;
(iii) criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3) as a felony;
(iv) arson (IC 35-43-1-1) as a felony;
(v) nonsupport of a dependent child (IC 35-46-1-5);
(vi) operating a motorboat while intoxicated (IC 35-46-9-6)
(before its repeal) as a felony;
(vii) a felony involving a weapon under IC 35-47;
(viii) a felony relating to controlled substances under
IC 35-48-4; or
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(ix) a felony under IC 9-30-5;
if the conviction did not occur within the past five (5) years; or
(C) had a juvenile adjudication for a nonwaivable offense, as
defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that, if committed by an adult,
would be a felony; and
(2) the person's commission of the offense, delinquent act, or act
of abuse or neglect described in subdivision (1) is not relevant to
the person's present ability to care for a child, and the placement
is in the best interest of the child.
However, a court or the department shall not make an out-of-home
placement if the person has been convicted of a nonwaivable offense,
as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that is not specifically excluded under
subdivision (1)(B).
(h) In considering the placement under subsection (g), the court or
the department shall consider the following:
(1) The length of time since the person committed the offense,
delinquent act, or abuse or neglect.
(2) The severity of the offense, delinquent act, or abuse or neglect.
(3) Evidence of the person's rehabilitation, including the person's
cooperation with a treatment plan, if applicable.
SECTION 39. IC 31-34-20-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 161, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (d), the juvenile court may not enter a dispositional decree
approving or ordering placement of a child in another home under
section 1(a)(3) of this chapter or awarding wardship to the department
that will place the child in another home under section 1(a)(4) of this
chapter if a person who is currently residing in the home in which the
child would be placed under section 1(a)(3) or 1(a)(4) of this chapter
has committed an act resulting in a substantiated report of child abuse
or neglect, has a juvenile adjudication for an act that would be a
nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if committed by an
adult, or has a conviction for a nonwaivable offense, as defined in
IC 31-9-2-84.8.
(b) The department or caseworker who prepared the predispositional
report shall conduct a criminal history check (as defined in
IC 31-9-2-22.5) to determine if a person described in subsection (a) has
committed an act resulting in a substantiated report of child abuse or
neglect, has a juvenile adjudication for an act that would be a
nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if committed by an
adult, or has a conviction for a nonwaivable offense, as defined in
IC 31-9-2-84.8. However, the department or caseworker is not required
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


to conduct a criminal history check under this section if criminal
history information under IC 31-34-4-2 or IC 31-34-18-6.1 establishes
whether a person described in subsection (a) has committed an act
resulting in a substantiated report of child abuse or neglect, has a
juvenile adjudication for an act that would be a nonwaivable offense,
as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if committed by an adult, or has a
conviction for a nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8.
(c) The department or caseworker is not required to conduct a
criminal history check under this section if:
(1) the department or caseworker is considering only an
out-of-home placement to an entity or a facility that:
(A) is not a residence (as defined in IC 3-5-2.1-90); or
(B) is licensed by the state; or
(2) placement under this section is undetermined at the time the
predispositional report is prepared.
(d) A juvenile court may enter a dispositional decree that approves
placement of a child in another home or award wardship to the
department that will place the child in a home with a person described
in subsection (a) if:
(1) the person described in subsection (a) has:
(A) committed an act resulting in a substantiated report of
child abuse or neglect;
(B) been convicted of:
(i) battery (IC 35-42-2-1);
(ii) criminal recklessness (IC 35-42-2-2) as a felony;
(iii) criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3) as a felony;
(iv) arson (IC 35-43-1-1) as a felony;
(v) nonsupport of a dependent child (IC 35-46-1-5);
(vi) operating a motorboat while intoxicated (IC 35-46-9-6)
(before its repeal) as a felony;
(vii) a felony involving a weapon under IC 35-47;
(viii) a felony relating to controlled substances under
IC 35-48-4; or
(ix) a felony under IC 9-30-5;
if the conviction did not occur within the past five (5) years; or
(C) had a juvenile adjudication for a nonwaivable offense, as
defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that, if committed by an adult,
would be a felony; and
(2) the person's commission of the offense, delinquent act, or act
of abuse or neglect described in subdivision (1) is not relevant to
the person's present ability to care for a child, and placing a child
in another home or awarding wardship to the department is in the
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


best interest of the child.
However, a court may not enter a dispositional decree that approves
placement of a child in another home or awards wardship to the
department if the person has been convicted of a nonwaivable offense,
as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that is not specifically excluded under
subdivision (1)(B).
(e) In considering the placement under subsection (d), the court
shall consider the following:
(1) The length of time since the person committed the offense,
delinquent act, or act that resulted in the substantiated report of
abuse or neglect.
(2) The severity of the offense, delinquent act, or abuse or neglect.
(3) Evidence of the person's rehabilitation, including the person's
cooperation with a treatment plan, if applicable.
SECTION 40. IC 31-34-21-7.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 119, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (d), the juvenile court may not approve a permanency plan
under subsection (c)(1)(C), (c)(1)(D), or (c)(1)(E) if a person who is
currently residing with a person described in subsection (c)(1)(C) or
(c)(1)(D) or in a residence in which the child would be placed under
subsection (c)(1)(E) has committed an act resulting in a substantiated
report of child abuse or neglect, has a juvenile adjudication for an act
that would be a nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if
committed by an adult, or has a conviction for a nonwaivable offense,
as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8.
(b) Before requesting juvenile court approval of a permanency plan,
the department shall conduct a criminal history check (as defined in
IC 31-9-2-22.5) to determine if a person described in subsection (a) has
committed an act resulting in a substantiated report of child abuse or
neglect, has a juvenile adjudication for an act that would be a
nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if committed by an
adult, or has a conviction for a nonwaivable offense, as defined in
IC 31-9-2-84.8. However, the department is not required to conduct a
criminal history check under this section if criminal history information
under IC 31-34-4-2, IC 31-34-18-6.1, or IC 31-34-20-1.5 establishes
whether a person described in subsection (a) has committed an act
resulting in a substantiated report of child abuse or neglect, has a
juvenile adjudication for an act that would be a nonwaivable offense,
as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if committed by an adult, or has a
conviction for a nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8.
(c) A permanency plan, or plans, if concurrent planning, under this
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


chapter includes the following:
(1) The intended permanent or long term arrangements for care
and custody of the child that may include any one (1), or two (2),
if concurrent planning, of the following arrangements that the
department or the court considers most appropriate and consistent
with the best interests of the child:
(A) Return to or continuation of existing custodial care within
the home of the child's parent, guardian, or custodian or
placement of the child with the child's noncustodial parent.
(B) Placement of the child for adoption.
(C) Placement of the child with a responsible person,
including:
(i) an adult sibling;
(ii) a grandparent;
(iii) an aunt;
(iv) an uncle;
(v) a custodial parent of a sibling of the child; or
(vi) another relative;
who is able and willing to act as the child's permanent
custodian and carry out the responsibilities required by the
permanency plan.
(D) Appointment of a legal guardian. The legal guardian
appointed under this section is a caretaker in a judicially
created relationship between the child and caretaker that is
intended to be permanent and self-sustaining as evidenced by
the transfer to the caretaker of the following parental rights
with respect to the child:
(i) Care, custody, and control of the child.
(ii) Decision making concerning the child's upbringing.
(E) A supervised independent living arrangement or foster
care for the child with a permanency plan of another planned,
permanent living arrangement. However, a child less than
sixteen (16) years of age may not have another planned,
permanent living arrangement as the child's permanency plan.
(2) A time schedule for implementing the applicable provisions
of the permanency plan.
(3) Provisions for temporary or interim arrangements for care and
custody of the child, pending completion of implementation of the
permanency plan.
(4) Other items required to be included in a case plan under
IC 31-34-15 or federal law, consistent with the permanent or long
term arrangements described by the permanency plan.
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(d) A juvenile court may approve a permanency plan if:
(1) a person described in subsection (a) has:
(A) committed an act resulting in a substantiated report of
child abuse or neglect;
(B) been convicted of:
(i) battery (IC 35-42-2-1);
(ii) criminal recklessness (IC 35-42-2-2) as a felony;
(iii) criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3) as a felony;
(iv) arson (IC 35-43-1-1) as a felony;
(v) nonsupport of a dependent child (IC 35-46-1-5);
(vi) operating a motorboat while intoxicated (IC 35-46-9-6)
(before its repeal) as a felony;
(vii) a felony involving a weapon under IC 35-47;
(viii) a felony relating to controlled substances under
IC 35-48-4; or
(ix) a felony under IC 9-30-5;
if the conviction did not occur within the past five (5) years; or
(C) had a juvenile adjudication for a nonwaivable offense, as
defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that, if committed by an adult,
would be a felony; and
(2) the person's commission of the offense, delinquent act, or act
of abuse or neglect described in subdivision (1) is not relevant to
the person's present ability to care for a child, and that approval
of the permanency plan is in the best interest of the child.
However, a court may not approve a permanency plan if the person has
been convicted of a nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8
that is not specifically excluded under subdivision (1)(B), or has a
juvenile adjudication for an act that would be a nonwaivable offense,
as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if committed by an adult that is not
specifically excluded under subdivision (1)(B).
(e) In making its written finding under subsection (d), the court shall
consider the following:
(1) The length of time since the person committed the offense,
delinquent act, or act that resulted in the substantiated report of
abuse or neglect.
(2) The severity of the offense, delinquent act, or abuse or neglect.
(3) Evidence of the person's rehabilitation, including the person's
cooperation with a treatment plan, if applicable.
SECTION 41. IC 31-37-5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.217-2014,
SECTION 183, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) If a child is alleged to have
committed an act that would be an offense under IC 9-30-5 if
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


committed by an adult, a juvenile court shall recommend the
immediate suspension of the child's driving privileges as provided in
IC 9-30-5. If a court recommends suspension of a child's driving
privileges under this section, the bureau of motor vehicles shall comply
with the recommendation of suspension as provided in IC 9-30-6-12.
(b) If a court recommends suspension of a child's driving privileges
under this section, the court may order the bureau of motor vehicles to
reinstate the child's driving privileges as provided in IC 9-30-6-11.
(c) If a juvenile court orders the bureau of motor vehicles to
reinstate a child's driving privileges under subsection (b), the bureau
shall comply with the order. Unless the order for reinstatement is
issued as provided under IC 9-30-6-11(a)(2) because of a violation of
the speedy trial provisions applicable to the juvenile court, the bureau
shall also do the following:
(1) Remove any record of the suspension from the bureau's record
keeping system.
(2) Reinstate the privileges without cost to the person.
(d) If a juvenile court orders a suspension under this section and the
child did not refuse to submit to a chemical test offered under
IC 9-30-6-2 during the investigation of the delinquent act that would
have been an offense under IC 9-30-5 if committed by an adult, the
juvenile court may grant the child specialized driving privileges in
conformity with the procedures in IC 9-30-16.
(e) If a proceeding described in this section is terminated in favor of
the child and the child did not refuse to submit to a chemical test
offered as provided under IC 9-30-6-2 during the investigation of the
delinquent act that would be an offense under IC 9-30-5 if committed
by an adult, the bureau shall remove any record of the suspension,
including the reasons for the suspension, from the child's official
driving record.
(f) The bureau of motor vehicles may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to carry out this section.
SECTION 42. IC 31-37-19-6.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 163, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (d), the juvenile court may not enter a dispositional decree
approving placement of a child in another home under section 1(a)(3)
or 6(b)(2)(D) of this chapter or awarding wardship to a person or
facility that results in a placement with a person under section 1(a)(4)
or 6(b)(2)(E) of this chapter if a person who is currently residing in the
home in which the child would be placed under section 1(a)(3), 1(a)(4),
6(b)(2)(D), or 6(b)(2)(E) of this chapter has committed an act resulting
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


in a substantiated report of child abuse or neglect, has a juvenile
adjudication for an act that would be a nonwaivable offense, as defined
in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if committed by an adult, or has a conviction for a
nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8.
(b) The juvenile probation officer who prepared the predispositional
report shall conduct a criminal history check (as defined in
IC 31-9-2-22.5) to determine if a person described in subsection (a) has
committed an act resulting in a substantiated report of child abuse or
neglect, has a juvenile adjudication for an act that would be a
nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if committed by an
adult, or has a conviction for a nonwaivable offense, as defined in
IC 31-9-2-84.8. However, the probation officer is not required to
conduct a criminal history check under this section if criminal history
information obtained under IC 31-37-17-6.1 establishes whether a
person described in subsection (a) has committed an act resulting in a
substantiated report of child abuse or neglect, has a juvenile
adjudication for an act that would be a nonwaivable offense, as defined
in IC 31-9-2-84.8 if committed by an adult, or has a conviction for a
nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8.
(c) The juvenile probation officer is not required to conduct a
criminal history check under this section if:
(1) the probation officer is considering only an out-of-home
placement to an entity or a facility that:
(A) is not a residence (as defined in IC 3-5-2.1-90); or
(B) is licensed by the state; or
(2) placement under this section is undetermined at the time the
predispositional report is prepared.
(d) The juvenile court may enter a dispositional decree approving
placement of a child in another home under section 1(a)(3) or
6(b)(2)(D) of this chapter or awarding wardship to a person or facility
that results in a placement with a person under section 1(a)(4) or
6(b)(2)(E) of this chapter if:
(1) a person described in subsection (a) has:
(A) committed an act resulting in a substantiated report of
child abuse or neglect;
(B) been convicted of:
(i) a felony under IC 9-30-5;
(ii) battery (IC 35-42-2-1);
(iii) criminal recklessness (IC 35-42-2-2) as a felony;
(iv) criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3) as a felony;
(v) arson (IC 35-43-1-1) as a felony;
(vi) nonsupport of a dependent child (IC 35-46-1-5);
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(vii) operating a motorboat while intoxicated (IC 35-46-9-6)
(before its repeal) as a felony;
(viii) a felony involving a weapon under IC 35-47; or
(ix) a felony relating to controlled substances under
IC 35-48-4;
if the conviction did not occur within the past five (5) years; or
(C) had a juvenile adjudication for a nonwaivable offense, as
defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that, if committed by an adult,
would be a felony; and
(2) the person's commission of the offense, delinquent act, or act
of abuse or neglect described in subdivision (1) is not relevant to
the person's present ability to care for a child, and placing the
child in another home is in the best interest of the child.
However, a court may not enter a dispositional decree placing a child
in another home under section 1(a)(3) or 6(b)(2)(D) of this chapter or
awarding wardship to a person or facility under this subsection if a
person with whom the child is or will be placed has been convicted of
a nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that is not
specifically excluded under subdivision (1)(B).
(e) In considering the placement under subsection (d), the court
shall consider the following:
(1) The length of time since the person committed the offense,
delinquent act, or act that resulted in the substantiated report of
abuse or neglect.
(2) The severity of the offense, delinquent act, or abuse or neglect.
(3) Evidence of the person's rehabilitation, including the person's
cooperation with a treatment plan, if applicable.
SECTION 43. IC 31-37-19-17.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.217-2014,
SECTION 184, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17.3. (a) This section applies if a
child is a delinquent child under IC 31-37-1 due to the commission of
a delinquent act that, if committed by an adult, would be an offense
under IC 9-30-5.
(b) The juvenile court shall, in addition to any other order or decree
the court makes under this chapter, recommend the suspension of the
child's driving privileges as provided in IC 9-30-5. If a court
recommends suspension of a child's driving privileges under this
section, the bureau of motor vehicles shall comply with the
recommendation of suspension as provided in IC 9-30-6-12.
(c) If a court recommends suspension of a child's driving privileges
under this section, the court may order the bureau of motor vehicles to
reinstate the child's driving privileges as provided in IC 9-30-6-11.
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


(d) If a juvenile court orders the bureau of motor vehicles to
reinstate a child's driving privileges under subsection (c), the bureau
shall comply with the order. Unless the order for reinstatement is
issued as provided under IC 9-30-6-11(a)(2) because of a violation of
the speedy trial provisions applicable to the juvenile court, the bureau
shall also do the following:
(1) Remove any record of the suspension from the bureau's record
keeping system.
(2) Reinstate the privileges without cost to the person.
(e) If:
(1) a juvenile court recommends suspension of a child's driving
privileges under this section; and
(2) the child did not refuse to submit to a chemical test offered as
provided under IC 9-30-6-2 during the investigation of the
delinquent act that would be an offense under IC 9-30-5 if
committed by an adult;
the juvenile court may stay the execution of the suspension of the
child's driving privileges and grant the child probationary driving
privileges for one hundred eighty (180) days.
(f) If a juvenile court orders a suspension under this section and the
child did not refuse to submit to a chemical test offered under
IC 9-30-6-2 during the investigation of the delinquent act that would
have been an offense under IC 9-30-5 if committed by an adult, the
juvenile court may grant the child specialized driving privileges in
conformity with the procedures in IC 9-30-16.
(g) A child whose driving privileges are suspended under this
section is entitled to credit for any days during which the license was
suspended under IC 31-37-5-7, if the child did not refuse to submit to
a chemical test offered as provided under IC 9-30-6-2 during the
investigation of the delinquent act that would be an offense under
IC 9-30-5 if committed by an adult.
(h) A period of suspension of driving privileges imposed under this
section must be consecutive to any period of suspension imposed under
IC 31-37-5-7. However, if the juvenile court finds in the sentencing
order that it is in the best interest of society, the juvenile court may
terminate all or any part of the remaining suspension under
IC 31-37-5-7.
(i) The bureau of motor vehicles may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to carry out this section.
SECTION 44. IC 35-31.5-2-37.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 37.5. "Chemical test", for purposes of IC 35-46-9,
has the meaning set forth in IC 35-46-9-1.
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


SECTION 45. IC 35-31.5-2-177.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 177.5. "Intoxicated", for purposes of IC 35-46-9,
has the meaning set forth in IC 35-46-9-2.
SECTION 46. IC 35-31.5-2-206.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 206.5. "Motorboat", for purposes of IC 35-46-9,
has the meaning set forth in IC 35-46-9-3.
SECTION 47. IC 35-31.5-2-244.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 244.5. "Prima facie evidence of intoxication", for
purposes of IC 35-46-9, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-46-9-4.
SECTION 48. IC 35-31.5-2-273.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 273.5. "Relevant evidence", for purposes of
IC 35-46-9, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-46-9-5.
SECTION 49. IC 35-33-7-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. A person charged with a
misdemeanor under IC 9-30-5-1 or IC 9-30-5-2 may waive the
person's initial hearing.
SECTION 50. IC 35-33-7-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.166-2024,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) At the initial hearing of a person, the
judicial officer shall inform the person orally or in writing:
(1) that the person has a right to retain counsel and if the person
intends to retain counsel the person must do so within:
(A) twenty (20) days if the person is charged with a felony; or
(B) ten (10) days if the person is charged only with one (1) or
more misdemeanors;
after this initial hearing because there are deadlines for filing
motions and raising defenses, and if those deadlines are missed,
the legal issues and defenses that could have been raised will be
waived;
(2) that the person has a right to assigned counsel at no expense
to the person if the person is indigent;
(3) that the person has a right to a speedy trial;
(4) of the amount and conditions of bail;
(5) of the person's privilege against self-incrimination;
(6) of the nature of the charge against the person;
(7) that a preliminary plea of not guilty is being entered for the
person and the preliminary plea of not guilty will become a formal
plea of not guilty:
(A) twenty (20) days after the completion of the initial
hearing; or
(B) ten (10) days after the completion of the initial hearing if
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151


the person is charged only with one (1) or more
misdemeanors;
unless the defendant enters a different plea; and
(8) that the person may request to petition for a specialized
driving privileges hearing if the person is charged with:
(A) any offense in which the operation of a motor vehicle is an
element of the offense;
(B) any offense under IC 9-30-5, IC 35-46-9 (before its
repeal), or IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal); or
(C) any offense under IC 35-42-1, IC 35-42-2, or
IC 35-44.1-3-1 that involves the use of a vehicle.
In addition, the judge shall direct the prosecuting attorney to give the
defendant or the defendant's attorney a copy of any formal felony
charges filed or ready to be filed. The judge shall, upon request of the
defendant, direct the prosecuting attorney to give the defendant or the
defendant's attorney a copy of any formal misdemeanor charges filed
or ready to be filed.
(b) This subsection applies to a pregnant woman charged with a
drug crime. If the woman is otherwise qualified, including meeting any
requirements under IC 33-23-16-13(3)(A), if applicable, the judge may,
after consulting with the prosecuting attorney, refer the woman to the
forensic diversion program (IC 11-12-3.7) or a drug court (IC
33-23-16).
SECTION 51. IC 35-46-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Operating a Motorboat While Intoxicated).
2026 IN 251—LS 7114/DI 151